West Virginia, session 2026, SB379.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-2D-3 of this code, modified by the Division of Natural Resources to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 11, 2025, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (wildlife rehabilitation, 58 CSR 21), is authorized.